Florida, session 2026, SB668.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.âPresent subsections (7) through (16) of section 32 458.347, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (8) 33 through (17), respectively, a new subsection (7) is added to 34 that section, and subsection (1) and paragraph (e) of subsection 35 (2) of that section are amended, to read: 36 458.347âPhysician assistants.â 37 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âThe purpose of this section is to 38 provide means by which physician assistants may practice 39 medicine in collaboration with physicians and other health care 40 practitioners to ensure high-quality medical care is available 41 at a reasonable cost to consumers. authorize Physician 42 assistants, with their education, training, and experience in 43 the field of medicine, are well suited to provide these to 44 provide increased efficiency of and access to high-quality 45 medical services at a reasonable cost to consumers. 46 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 47 (e)ââPhysician assistantâ means a person who is a graduate 48 of an approved program or its equivalent or meets standards 49 approved by the council boards and is licensed to perform 50 medical services delegated by the supervising physician. 51 (7)âPRACTICING WITHOUT PHYSICIAN SUPERVISION.â 52 (a)âRegistration.âTo practice without physician 53 supervision, a physician assistant must register with the 54 council on a form prescribed by the council. The council must 55 register a physician assistant to practice without physician 56 supervision if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of 57 the council that he or she meets all of the following criteria: 58 1.âHolds an active, unencumbered license to practice as a 59 physician assistant under this chapter. A physician assistant 60 practicing under a temporary license, a temporary certificate 61 for practice in areas of critical need, or any other type of 62 conditional license is not eligible for registration under this 63 subsection. 64 2.âHas not been subject to disciplinary action as specified 65 in s. 456.072 or s. 458.331 or any similar disciplinary action 66 in another state or other territory or jurisdiction within the 5 67 years immediately preceding the registration application. 68 3.âHas completed, in any state, jurisdiction, or territory 69 of the United States, at least 3,000 clinical practice hours, 70 which may include clinical instructional hours provided by the 71 applicant, within the 5 years immediately preceding the 72 registration application. For purposes of this paragraph, the 73 term âclinical instructionâ means education provided by faculty 74 in a clinical setting in a graduate program leading to a 75 masterâs or doctoral degree in a clinical physician assistant 76 practice area. 77 4.âHas fulfilled any other condition of registration 78 prescribed by council rule. 79 (b)âFinancial responsibility.â 80 1.âA physician assistant registered under this subsection 81 must, by one of the following methods, demonstrate to the 82 satisfaction of the council and the department financial 83 responsibility to pay claims and costs ancillary thereto arising 84 out of the rendering of, or the failure to render, medical care, 85 treatment, or services: 86 a.âObtaining and maintaining professional liability 87 coverage in an amount not less than $100,000 per claim, with a 88 minimum annual aggregate of not less than $300,000, from an 89 authorized insurer as defined in s. 624.09, from a surplus lines 90 insurer as defined in s. 626.914(2), from a risk retention group 91 as defined in s. 627.942, from the Joint Underwriting 92 Association established under s. 627.351(4), or through a plan 93 of self-insurance as provided in s. 627.357; or 94 b.âObtaining and maintaining an unexpired, irrevocable 95 letter of credit, established pursuant to chapter 675, in an 96 amount of not less than $100,000 per claim, with a minimum 97 aggregate availability of credit of not less than $300,000. The 98 letter of credit must be payable to the physician assistant as 99 beneficiary upon presentment of a final judgment indicating 100 liability and awarding damages to be paid by the physician 101 assistant or upon presentment of a settlement agreement signed 102 by all parties to such agreement when such final judgment or 103 settlement is a result of a claim arising out of the rendering 104 of, or the failure to render, medical care and services. 105 2.âThe requirements of subparagraph 1. do not apply to any 106 of the following: 107 a.âA physician assistant registered under this subsection 108 who practices exclusively as an officer, employee, or agent of 109 the Federal Government or of the state or its agencies or its 110 subdivisions. 111 b.âA physician assistant whose registration under this 112 subsection has become inactive and who is not practicing as a 113 physician assistant registered under this subsection in this 114 state. 115 c.âA physician assistant registered under this subsection 116 who practices only in conjunction with his or her teaching 117 duties at an accredited school or its main teaching hospitals. 118 Such practice is limited to that which is incidental to and a 119 necessary part of duties in connection with the teaching 120 position. 121 d.âA physician assistant who holds an active registration 122 under this subsection and who is not engaged in practice without 123 physician supervision as authorized under this subsection in 124 this state. If such person initiates or resumes any practice as 125 a physician assistant without physician supervision, he or she 126 must notify the department of such activity and fulfill the 127 professional liability coverage requirements of subparagraph 1. 128 (c)âPractice requirements.â 129 1.âA physician assistant registered under this subsection 130 may engage in any of the following activities without physician 131 supervision: 132 a.âPractice in primary care, family medicine, pediatrics, 133 internal medicine, womenâs health, and psychiatry as defined by 134 council rule. 135 b.âPerform the general functions of a physician assistant. 136 c.âFor a patient who requires the services of a health care 137 facility as defined in s. 408.032(8): 138 (I)âAdmit the patient to the facility. 139 (II)âManage the care received by the patient in the 140 facility. 141 (III)âDischarge the patient from the facility, unless 142 prohibited by federal law or rule. 143 d.âProvide a signature, a certification, a stamp, a 144 verification, an affidavit, or an endorsement that is otherwise 145 required by law to be provided by a physician, except that a 146 physician assistant registered under this subsection may not 147 issue a physician certification under s. 381.986. 148 2.âA physician assistant engaging in practice under this 149 subsection may not perform any surgical procedure that goes 150 deeper than the subcutaneous tissue. 151 3.âThe council shall, in consultation with the boards, 152 adopt rules establishing standards of practice for physician 153 assistants registered under this subsection. 154 (d)âRegistration renewal.âA physician assistant must 155 biennially renew registration under this subsection. The 156 biennial renewal for registration must coincide with the 157 physician assistantâs biennial renewal period for licensure. 158 (e)âPractitioner profile.âThe department must conspicuously 159 distinguish a physician assistantâs license if he or she is 160 registered with the council under this subsection and include 161 the registration in the physician assistant practitioner profile 162 created under s. 456.041. 163 (f)âDisclosures.âWhen engaging in practice under this 164 subsection, a physician assistant shall provide each new patient 165 information in writing detailing the physician assistantâs 166 qualifications and the fact that he or she is practicing without 167 physician supervision. The information must be provided to the 168 patient either before or during the initial patient encounter. 169 (g)âRules.âThe council shall adopt rules to implement this 170 subsection. 171 (h)âConstruction.âThis subsection may not be construed to 172 limit a physician assistant from practicing under a supervisory 173 agreement with a physician. 174 Section 2.âPresent subsections (7) through (16) of section 175 459.022, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (8) 176 through (17), respectively, a new subsection (7) is added to 177 that section, and subsection (1) and paragraph (e) of subsection 178 (2) of that section are amended, to read: 179 459.022âPhysician assistants.â 180 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âThe purpose of this section is to 181 provide means by which physician assistants may practice 182 medicine in collaboration with physicians and other health care 183 practitioners to ensure high-quality medical care is available 184 at a reasonable cost to consumers. authorize Physician 185 assistants, with their education, training, and experience in 186 the field of medicine, are well suited to provide these to 187 provide increased efficiency of and access to high-quality 188 medical services at a reasonable cost to consumers. 189 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 190 (e)ââPhysician assistantâ means a person who is a graduate 191 of an approved program or its equivalent or meets standards 192 approved by the council boards and is licensed to perform 193 medical services delegated by the supervising physician. 194 (7)âPRACTICING WITHOUT PHYSICIAN SUPERVISION.â 195 (a)âRegistration.âTo practice without physician 196 supervision, a physician assistant must register with the 197 council on a form prescribed by the council. The council must 198 register a physician assistant to practice without physician 199 supervision if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of 200 the council that he or she meets all of the following criteria: 201 1.âHolds an active, unencumbered license to practice as a 202 physician assistant under this chapter. A physician assistant 203 practicing under a temporary license, a temporary certificate 204 for practice in areas of critical need, or any other type of 205 conditional license is not eligible for registration under this 206 subsection. 207 2.âHas not been subject to disciplinary action as specified 208 in s. 456.072 or s. 459.015 or any similar disciplinary action 209 in another state or other territory or jurisdiction within the 5 210 years immediately preceding the registration application. 211 3.âHas completed, in any state, jurisdiction, or territory 212 of the United States, at least 3,000 clinical practice hours, 213 which may include clinical instructional hours provided by the 214 applicant, within the 5 years immediately preceding the 215 registration application. For purposes of this paragraph, the 216 term âclinical instructionâ means education provided by faculty 217 in a clinical setting in a graduate program leading to a 218 masterâs or doctoral degree in a clinical physician assistant 219 practice area. 220 4.âHas fulfilled any other condition of registration 221 prescribed by council rule. 222 (b)âFinancial responsibility.â 223 1.âA physician assistant registered under this subsection 224 must, by one of the following methods, demonstrate to the 225 satisfaction of the council and the department financial 226 responsibility to pay claims and costs ancillary thereto arising 227 out of the rendering of, or the failure to render, medical care, 228 treatment, or services: 229 a.âObtaining and maintaining professional liability 230 coverage in an amount not less than $100,000 per claim, with a 231 minimum annual aggregate of not less than $300,000, from an 232 authorized insurer as defined in s. 624.09, from a surplus lines 233 insurer as defined in s. 626.914(2), from a risk retention group 234 as defined in s. 627.942, from the Joint Underwriting 235 Association established under s. 627.351(4), or through a plan 236 of self-insurance as provided in s. 627.357; or 237 b.âObtaining and maintaining an unexpired, irrevocable 238 letter of credit, established pursuant to chapter 675, in an 239 amount of not less than $100,000 per claim, with a minimum 240 aggregate availability of credit of not less than $300,000. The 241 letter of credit must be payable to the physician assistant as 242 beneficiary upon presentment of a final judgment indicating 243 liability and awarding damages to be paid by the physician 244 assistant or upon presentment of a settlement agreement signed 245 by all parties to such agreement when such final judgment or 246 settlement is a result of a claim arising out of the rendering 247 of, or the failure to render, medical care and services. 248 2.âThe requirements of subparagraph 1. do not apply to any 249 of the following: 250 a.âA physician assistant registered under this subsection 251 who practices exclusively as an officer, employee, or agent of 252 the Federal Government or of the state or its agencies or its 253 subdivisions. 254 b.âA physician assistant whose registration under this 255 subsection has become inactive and who is not practicing as a 256 physician assistant registered under this subsection in this 257 state. 258 c.âA physician assistant registered under this subsection 259 who practices only in conjunction with his or her teaching 260 duties at an accredited school or its main teaching hospitals. 261 Such practice is limited to that which is incidental to and a 262 necessary part of duties in connection with the teaching 263 position. 264 d.âA physician assistant who holds an active registration 265 under this subsection and who is not engaged in practice without 266 physician supervision as authorized under this subsection in 267 this state. If such person initiates or resumes any practice as 268 a physician assistant without physician supervision, he or she 269 must notify the department of such activity and fulfill the 270 professional liability coverage requirements of subparagraph 1. 271 (c)âPractice requirements.â 272 1.âA physician assistant registered under this subsection 273 may engage in any of the following activities without physician 274 supervision: 275 a.âPractice in primary care, family medicine, pediatrics, 276 internal medicine, womenâs health, and psychiatry as defined by 277 council rule. 278 b.âPerform the general functions of a physician assistant. 279 c.âFor a patient who requires the services of a health care 280 facility as defined in s. 408.032(8): 281 (I)âAdmit the patient to the facility. 282 (II)âManage the care received by the patient in the 283 facility. 284 (III)âDischarge the patient from the facility, unless 285 prohibited by federal law or rule. 286 d.âProvide a signature, a certification, a stamp, a 287 verification, an affidavit, or an endorsement that is otherwise 288 required by law to be provided by a physician, except that a 289 physician assistant registered under this subsection may not 290 issue a physician certification under s. 381.986. 291 2.âA physician assistant engaging in practice under this 292 subsection may not perform any surgical procedure that goes 293 deeper than the subcutaneous tissue. 294 3.âThe council shall, in consultation with the boards, 295 adopt rules establishing standards of practice for physician 296 assistants registered under this subsection. 297 (d)âRegistration renewal.âA physician assistant must 298 biennially renew registration under this subsection. The 299 biennial renewal for registration must coincide with the 300 physician assistantâs biennial renewal period for licensure. 301 (e)âPractitioner profile.âThe department must conspicuously 302 distinguish a physician assistantâs license if he or she is 303 registered with the council under this subsection and include 304 the registration in the physician assistant practitioner profile 305 created under s. 456.041. 306 (f)âDisclosures.âWhen engaging in practice under this 307 subsection, a physician assistant shall provide each new patient 308 information in writing detailing the physician assistantâs 309 qualifications and the fact that he or she is practicing without 310 physician supervision. The information must be provided to the 311 patient either before or during the initial patient encounter. 312 (g)âRules.âThe council shall adopt rules to implement this 313 subsection. 314 (h)âConstruction.âThis subsection may not be construed to 315 limit a physician assistant from practicing under a supervisory 316 agreement with a physician. 317 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.